Oklahoma, session 2026, SB204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2025 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes in the following amounts:


1. For individual taxpayers married to the same individual for


at least one (1) and less than six (6) consecutive years before the


end of the corresponding tax year, Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00)


for joint filers and Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) for those


married filing separately;

Req. No. 418 Page 1


2. For individual taxpayers married to the same individual for


at least six (6) and less than eleven (11) consecutive years before


the end of the corresponding tax year, One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00) for joint filers and Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for


those married filing separately;


3. For individual taxpayers married to the same individual for


at least eleven (11) and less than sixteen (16) consecutive years


before the end of the corresponding tax year, One Thousand Five


Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) for joint filers and Seven Hundred Fifty


Dollars ($750.00) for those married filing separately; and


4. For individual taxpayers married to the same individual for


at least sixteen (16) consecutive years before the end of the


corresponding tax year, Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for joint


filers and One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for those married filing


separately.


B. Credit authorized pursuant to this section shall be claimed


on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission. The form shall


require the name of the taxpayer and spouse, the date of the


marriage, a copy of a marriage license from this state or another


state issued under strict compliance with the provisions of Sections


and 3.1 of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and a signed


statement attesting, under penalty of perjury, that the marriage is


continuous from the date of marriage through the corresponding tax


year.

Req. No. 418 Page 2


C. The credit authorized pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall not be used to reduce the liability of the taxpayer to


less than zero (0). The credit authorized pursuant to the


provisions of this section shall not be transferable.


D. If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to the


provisions of this section exceeds the income tax liability, the


amount of credit not used in any tax year may be carried forward, in


order, to each of the five (5) subsequent tax years.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-418 QD 12/30/2024 3:48:02 PM



























Req. No. 418 Page 3